Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Convention Center Facility Financing Assistance Act:

(1) Applicant means the political subdivision that applies for assistance under the act;

(2) Associated hotel means any publicly or privately owned facility in which the public may, for a consideration, obtain sleeping accommodations and which is located, in whole or in part, within six hundred yards of an eligible facility, measured from any point of the exterior perimeter of the eligible facility but not from any parking facility or other structure, except that if the eligible facility is within six hundred yards of the State Capitol, the area used in determining associated hotels shall be one or more contiguous or noncontiguous areas within the territorial boundaries of the applicant which are selected by the applicant and which aggregate the same total amount of square footage that such area would have contained had the eligible facility not been within six hundred yards of the State Capitol. The area used in determining associated hotels shall be depicted on a map submitted pursuant to section 13-2605;

(3) Board means a board consisting of the Governor, the State Treasurer, the chairperson of the Nebraska Investment Council, the chairperson of the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy, and a professor of economics on the faculty of a state postsecondary educational institution appointed to a two-year term on the board by the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education. For administrative and budget purposes only, the board shall be considered part of the Department of Revenue;

(4) Bond means a general obligation bond, redevelopment bond, lease-purchase bond, revenue bond, or combination of any such bonds;

(5) Convention and meeting center facility means a temperature-controlled building and personal property primarily used as a convention and meeting center, including an auditorium, an exhibition hall, a facility for onsite food preparation and serving, an onsite, directly connected parking facility for the use of the convention and meeting center facility, a nearby parking facility for the use of the convention and meeting center facility, and an onsite administrative office of the convention and meeting center facility;

(6)(a) Eligible facility means any publicly owned convention and meeting center facility approved for state assistance on or before June 1, 2007, any publicly owned sports arena facility attached to such convention and meeting center facility, or any publicly owned convention and meeting center facility or publicly owned sports arena facility acquired, constructed, improved, or equipped after June 1, 2007; and

(b) Beginning with applications for financial assistance received on or after February 1, 2008, eligible facility does not include any publicly owned sports arena facility with a seating capacity of greater than sixteen thousand seats unless such facility is located in a city of the primary class;

(7) General obligation bond means any bond or refunding bond issued by a political subdivision and which is payable exclusively from the proceeds of an ad valorem tax;

(8) Maximum aggregate appropriation means (a) one hundred fifty million dollars for any one approved project, but not more than the total cost of acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, replacing, financing, or equipping the eligible facilities of the political subdivision, or (b) for an eligible facility located within six hundred yards of the State Capitol, the total cost of acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, replacing, financing, and equipping such facility, but only to the extent the cost of acquiring, constructing, improving, repairing, replacing, and equipping such facility does not exceed one hundred fifty million dollars;

(9) Nearby parking facility means any parking lot, parking garage, or other parking structure that is not directly connected to a convention and meeting center facility but which is located, in whole or in part, within six hundred yards of a convention and meeting center facility, measured from any point of the exterior perimeter of such facility but not from any other parking facility or other structure;

(10) Nearby retailer means a retailer as defined in section 77-2701.32 that is located, in whole or in part, within six hundred yards of an eligible facility the application for which is approved on or after June 7, 2023, measured from any point of the exterior perimeter of the eligible facility but not from any parking facility or other structure, except that if the eligible facility is within six hundred yards of the State Capitol, the area used in determining nearby retailers shall be one or more contiguous or noncontiguous areas within the territorial boundaries of the applicant which are selected by the applicant and which aggregate the same total amount of square footage that such area would have contained had the eligible facility not been within six hundred yards of the State Capitol. The area used in determining nearby retailers shall be depicted on a map submitted pursuant to section 13-2605;

(11) Political subdivision means any local governmental body formed and organized under state law and any joint entity or joint public agency created under state law to act on behalf of political subdivisions which has statutory authority to issue general obligation bonds;

(12) Revenue bond means any bond or refunding bond issued by a political subdivision which is limited or special rather than a general obligation bond of the political subdivision and which is not payable from the proceeds of an ad valorem tax; and

(13) Sports arena facility means any enclosed temperature-controlled building primarily used for competitive sports, including arenas, dressing and locker facilities, concession areas, parking facilities, and onsite administrative offices connected with operating the facilities.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB551, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB912, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB884, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB927, § 1;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB116, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 13.
July 18, 2026
Limitation on applications, see section 13-2612.